Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-149
Compensation payments; nonassignable; not subject to attachment; exceptions.

No proceeds or interest thereon from payments or lump-sum settlements under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act or law of another state which provides compensation and benefits for employees sustaining job-related injuries shall be assignable, subject to attachment or garnishment, or held liable in any way for any debts, except (1) as provided in section 48-108 and (2) payments under the act or any law of another state which provides compensation and benefits for employees sustaining job-related injuries shall be subject to income withholding under the Income Withholding for Child Support Act, administrative attachment and bank matching pursuant to sections 43-3328 to 43-3339, and garnishment by a county attorney or authorized attorney pursuant to section 43-512.03 or garnishment for child support as defined in section 43-1705 by an obligee as defined in section 43-1713.

Laws 1913, c. 198, § 50, p. 600;

R.S.1913, § 3691;

C.S.1922, § 3073;

C.S.1929, § 48-150;

R.S.1943, § 48-149;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 76;

Laws 1993, LB 523, § 24;

Laws 1993, LB 118, § 2;

Laws 1997, LB 752, § 124.

Income Withholding for Child Support Act, see section 43-1701.